Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 13
ACTION BY MEMBER

7-58-1301. Derivative action.

A member may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association if:

The member demands in a record that the association bring an action to enforce the right; and

Any of the following occur:

The association does not, within ninety days after the association receives the demand, agree to bring the action;

The association notifies the member in a record that it has rejected the demand;

Irreparable harm to the association would result by waiting ninety days after the association receives the demand; or

The association agrees to bring an action demanded and fails to bring the action within a reasonable time.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 809, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1302. Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association may be maintained only by a person that:

Is a member or a dissociated member at the time the action is commenced and:

Was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Whose status as a member devolved upon the person by operation of law or the articles or bylaws from a person that was a member at the time of the conduct; and

Adequately represents the interests of the association.

If the sole plaintiff in a derivative action dies while the action is pending, the court may permit another member who meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section to be substituted as plaintiff.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 809, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1303. Pleading.

In a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association, the complaint must state:

The date and content of the plaintiff's demand under section 7-58-1301 (1)(a) and the association's response;

If ninety days have not expired since the demand was received by the association, how irreparable harm to the association would result by waiting for the expiration of ninety days; and

If the association agreed to bring an action demanded, that the action has not been brought within a reasonable time.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 809, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1304. Approval for discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association may not be discontinued or settled without notice to the association and the court's approval.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 810, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1305. Proceeds and expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section:

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the association and not to the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff in the derivative action receives any proceeds, the plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the association.

If a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association is successful in whole or in part, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees and costs, from the recovery of the association if not otherwise awarded against the defendant.

On the termination of a derivative proceeding commenced pursuant to this part 13, where the court finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose, the court may order the plaintiff to pay any of the defendant's reasonable expenses, including attorney fees, incurred by the defendant in connection with the defense of the proceeding.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 810, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1306. Applicability of derivative proceeding to foreign limited cooperative associations.

In any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited cooperative association, the right of a person to commence or maintain a derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited cooperative association and any matters raised in the proceeding covered by sections 7-58-1301 to 7-58-1305 are governed by the law of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited cooperative association was formed; except that any matters raised in the proceeding covered by section 7-58-1304 are governed by the law of this state.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 810, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.